Hawaii statutes.
§453-1.3 Practice of telehealth. [Section
effective until December 31, 2016. For section effective January 1, 2017, see
below.] (a) Subject to section 453-2(b), nothing in this section shall
preclude any physician acting within the scope of the physician's license to
practice from practicing telehealth as defined in this section.

(b) For the purposes of this section,
"telehealth" means the use of telecommunications as that term is
defined in section 269-1, including but not limited to real-time video
conferencing-based communication, secure interactive and non-interactive
web-based communication, and secure asynchronous information exchange, to
transmit patient medical information, including diagnostic-quality digital
images and laboratory results for medical interpretation and diagnosis, for the
purposes of delivering enhanced health care services and information to parties
separated by distance, establishing a physician-patient relationship,
evaluating a patient, or treating a patient.

(c) Telehealth services shall include a
documented patient evaluation, including history and a discussion of physical
symptoms adequate to establish a diagnosis and to identify underlying
conditions or contraindications to the treatment recommended or provided.

(d) Treatment recommendations made via
telehealth, including issuing a prescription via electronic means, shall be
held to the same standards of appropriate practice as those in traditional
physician-patient settings that do not include a face-to-face visit but in
which prescribing is appropriate, including on-call telephone encounters and
encounters for which a follow-up visit is arranged. Issuing a prescription
based solely on an online questionnaire is not treatment for the purposes of
this section and does not constitute an acceptable standard of care. For the
purposes of prescribing a controlled substance, a physician-patient
relationship shall be established pursuant to chapter 329.

(e) All medical reports resulting from
telehealth services are part of a patient's health record and shall be made
available to the patient. Patient medical records shall be maintained in
compliance with all applicable state and federal requirements including privacy
requirements.

(f) A physician shall not use telehealth to
establish a physician-patient relationship with a patient in this State without
a license to practice medicine in Hawaii. Once a provider-patient relationship
is established, a patient or physician licensed in this State may use
telehealth for any purpose, including consultation with a medical provider
licensed in another state, authorized by this section or as otherwise provided
by law.

(g) Reimbursement for behavioral health
services provided through telehealth shall be equivalent to reimbursement for
the same services provided via face-to-face contact between a health care
provider and a patient. [L 2009, c 20, §2; am L 2013, c 189, §1; am L 2014, c
159, §7]

§453-1.3 Practice of telehealth. [Section
effective January 1, 2017. For section effective until December 31, 2016, see
above.] (a) Subject to section 453-2(b), nothing in this section shall
preclude any physician acting within the scope of the physician's license to
practice from practicing telehealth as defined in this section.

(b) Telehealth services shall include a
documented patient evaluation, including history and a discussion of physical
symptoms adequate to establish a diagnosis and to identify underlying
conditions or contraindications to the treatment recommended or provided.

(c) Treatment recommendations made via
telehealth, including issuing a prescription via electronic means, shall be
held to the same standards of appropriate practice as those in traditional
physician-patient settings that do not include a face-to-face visit but in
which prescribing is appropriate, including on-call telephone encounters and
encounters for which a follow-up visit is arranged. Issuing a prescription
based solely on an online questionnaire is not treatment for the purposes of
this section and does not constitute an acceptable standard of care. For the
purposes of prescribing opiates or medical marijuana, a physician-patient
relationship shall only be established after an in-person consultation between
the prescribing physician and the patient.

(d) All medical reports resulting from
telehealth services are part of a patient's health record and shall be made
available to the patient. Patient medical records shall be maintained in
compliance with all applicable state and federal requirements including privacy
requirements.

(e) A physician shall not use telehealth to
establish a physician-patient relationship with a patient in this State without
a license to practice medicine in Hawaii.

(f) A physician-patient relationship may be
established via telehealth if the patient is referred to the telehealth
provider by another health care provider who has conducted an in-person
consultation and has provided all pertinent patient information to the
telehealth provider. Once a provider-patient relationship is established, a
patient or physician licensed in this State may use telehealth for any purpose,
including consultation with a medical provider licensed in another state,
authorized by this section or as otherwise provided by law.

(g) The physician-patient relationship
prerequisite under this section shall not apply to telehealth consultations for
emergency department services.

(h) Reimbursement for behavioral health
services provided through telehealth shall be equivalent to reimbursement for the
same services provided via face-to-face contact between a health care provider
and a patient.

(i) Services provided by telehealth pursuant
to this chapter shall be consistent with all federal and state privacy,
security, and confidentiality laws.

(j) For the purposes of this section:

"Distant site" means the location of
the physician delivering services through telehealth at the time the services
are provided.

"Originating site" means the location
where the patient is located, whether accompanied or not by a health care
provider, at the time services are provided by a physician through telehealth,
including but not limited to a physician's office, hospital, health care
facility, a patient's home, and other non-medical environments such as school-based
health centers, university-based health centers, or the work location of a
patient.

"Telehealth" means the use of
telecommunications as that term is defined in section 269-1, to encompass four
modalities: store and forward technologies, remote monitoring, live
consultation, and mobile health; and which shall include but not be limited to real-time
video conferencing-based communication, secure interactive and non-interactive
web-based communication, and secure asynchronous information exchange, to transmit
patient medical information, including diagnostic-quality digital images and
laboratory results for medical interpretation and diagnosis, for the purposes
of: delivering enhanced health care services and information while a patient
is at an originating site and the physician is at a distant site; establishing
a physician-patient relationship; evaluating a patient; or treating a patient. [L
2009, c 20, §2; am L 2013, c 189, §1; am L 2014, c 159, §7; am L 2016, c 226,
§9]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next